Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.170

Violations—Inspections—Production of credentials.

An authorized representative of the department may investigate alleged or apparent violations of this chapter. An authorized representative of the department upon presentation of credentials may inspect sites at which a person is doing plumbing work for the purpose of determining whether that person has a certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter. Upon request of the authorized representative of the department, a person doing plumbing work shall produce his or her certificate or permit and photo identification.

[ 2009 c 36 s 5; 1983 c 124 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2009 c 36: See note following RCW 18.106.020.

Effective date—1983 c 124: See note following RCW 18.106.020.